Maryland, session 2026, HB1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–1901.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1314*

HOUSE BILL 1314
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Trust” means the Chesapeake Bay Trust.
8–1911.
(b) There is an Urban Trees Program administered by the Trust.
(h) (1) [For fiscal years 2024 through 2031, in] FOR each FISCAL year the
Governor shall include in the annual State budget an appropriation of $10,000,000 for the
Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–1911.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE URBAN TREES PROGRAM.
(3) “QUALIFIED ORGANIZATION” MEANS:
(I) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
(II) A SCHOOL;
(III) A COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION;
(IV) A SERVICE, YOUTH, OR CIVIC GROUP;
(V) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(VI) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY; OR
(VII) A FOREST CONSERVANCY DISTRICT BOARD.
(4) “UNDERSERVED AREA” MEANS AN AREA OF THE STATE FALLING
WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF:

HOUSE BILL 1314 3
(I) AN URBAN AREA, AS DELINEATED BY THE U.S. CENSUS
BUREAU; AND
(II) 1. A NEIGHBORHOOD THAT WAS, AT ANY POINT IN TIME,
REDLINED OR GRADED AS “HAZARDOUS” BY THE HOME OWNERS’ LOAN
CORPORATION;
2. A CENSUS TRACT WITH AN AVERAGE RATE OF
UNEMPLOYMENT FOR THE MOST RECENT 24–MONTH PERIOD FOR WHICH DATA ARE
AVAILABLE THAT EXCEEDS THE AVERAGE RATE OF UNEMPLOYMENT FOR THE
STATE;
3. A CENSUS TRACT WITH A MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD
INCOME FOR THE MOST RECENT 24–MONTH PERIOD FOR WHICH DATA ARE
AVAILABLE THAT IS EQUAL TO OR LESS THAN 75% OF THE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD
INCOME FOR THE STATE DURING THAT PERIOD; OR
4. A HOUSING PROJECT AS DEFINED IN § 12–101 OF THE
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THERE IS AN URBAN TREES PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE TRUST.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PLANT NATIVE SPECIES OF
TREES IN UNDERSERVED AREAS.
(D) (1) THE TRUST SHALL MAKE GRANTS TO QUALIFIED ORGANIZATIONS
FOR TREE–PLANTING PROJECTS IN UNDERSERVED AREAS.
(2) ELIGIBLE PROGRAM EXPENSES INCLUDE PERSONNEL COSTS,
SUPPLIES, SITE PREPARATION, AND OTHER EXPENSES AND MATERIALS RELATED TO
PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING, AND MAINTAINING TREE–PLANTING PROJECTS IN
UNDERSERVED AREAS.
(3) IN AWARDING PROGRAM GRANTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
TRUST SHALL PRIORITIZE:
(I) GRANT APPLICATIONS FROM QUALIFIED ORGANIZATIONS
LOCATED IN THE UNDERSERVED AREAS WHERE THE PROPOSED TREE–PLANTING
PROJECTS WILL BE IMPLEMENTED; AND
(II) GRANT APPLICATIONS THAT INCLUDE PLANS FOR
ENGAGING INDIVIDUALS, ORGANIZATIONS, OR BUSINESSES LOCATED IN

HOUSE BILL 1314
UNDERSERVED AREAS TO IMPLEMENT AND MAINTAIN TREE–PLANTING PROJECTS
IN THEIR COMMUNITIES.
(E) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE FUNDED WITH ANY FUNDS THAT MAY BE
ALLOCATED BY THE TRUST THROUGH ITS ANNUAL BUDGET PROCESS.
(2) THE TRUST SHALL SEEK FEDERAL FUNDS AND GRANTS AND
DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE SOURCES TO BE MADE TO THE TRUST FOR THE PURPOSE
OF THE PROGRAM.
(F) A GRANT AGREEMENT REGARDING FUNDS FROM THE TRUST FOR THE
PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) SPECIFY THE ALLOWED USE OF THE FUNDS PROVIDED UNDER
THE GRANT; AND
(2) INCLUDE PROVISIONS FOR VERIFICATION THAT TREE–PLANTING
PROJECTS ARE BEING IMPLEMENTED AND MAINTAINED AS PLANNED.
(G) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE TRUST SHALL REPORT TO
THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT ON THE GRANTS
AWARDED BY THE PROGRAM DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR,
INCLUDING:
(1) THE NAMES AND DESCRIPTIONS OF GRANT RECIPIENTS;
(2) THE NUMBER AND LOCATION OF TREES PLANTED BY GRANT
RECIPIENTS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR
THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT.
(H) (1) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $10,000,000 TO THE PROGRAM.
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND MAY NOT TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE
WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect on the termination of Section 3 of Chapter 645 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2021, in accordance with the termination provision specified in Section 11 of Chapter 645
of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2021. If Section 2 of this Act takes effect, Section 1
of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated

HOUSE BILL 1314 5
and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on
that termination provision.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.